test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-kytshom_gt-norm.yaml
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [кытшӧммет, кытшӧммезыт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметӧ, кытшӧммезтӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметлӧн, кытшӧммезытлӧн]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметлісь, кытшӧммезытлісь]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметлӧ, кытшӧммезытлӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: кытшӧммезнат 
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметкӧт, кытшӧммезыткӧт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметтӧг, кытшӧммезыттӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметла, кытшӧммезытла]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [кытшӧммется, кытшӧммезытся]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: кытшӧммезат
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [кытшӧммесит, кытшӧммезсит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: кытшӧммезат
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметлань, кытшӧммезытлань, кытшӧммезланят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметсянь, кытшӧммезытсянь, кытшӧммезсянят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезӧттят, кытшӧммезӧттит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезӧдззат, кытшӧммезӧдззит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметви, кытшӧммезытви]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезланят, кытшӧмметланьын, кытшӧммезытланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезланьсит, кытшӧмметланись, кытшӧммезытланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: [кытшӧммезланят, кытшӧмметланьӧ, кытшӧммезытланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметланьсянь, кытшӧммезытланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсянят]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметланьӧт, кытшӧммезытланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттят, кытшӧммезланьӧттит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметланьӧдз, кытшӧммезытланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззат, кытшӧммезланьӧдззит]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [кытшӧмметланьви, кытшӧммезытланьви] 


    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [кытшӧммес, кытшӧммезыс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесӧ, кытшӧммезсӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслӧн, кытшӧммезыслӧн]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслісь, кытшӧммезыслісь]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслӧ, кытшӧммезыслӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: кытшӧммезнас 
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [кытшӧммескӧт, кытшӧммезыскӧт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [кытшӧмместӧг, кытшӧммезыстӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесла, кытшӧммезысла]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесся, кытшӧммезысся]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: кытшӧммезас
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесис, кытшӧммезсис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: кытшӧммезас
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммеслань, кытшӧммезыслань, кытшӧммезланяс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммессянь, кытшӧммезыссянь, кытшӧммезсяняс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезӧттяс, кытшӧммезӧттис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезӧдззас, кытшӧммезӧдззис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесви, кытшӧммезысви]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезланяс, кытшӧммесланьын, кытшӧммезысланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезланьсис, кытшӧммесланись, кытшӧммезысланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [кытшӧммезланяс, кытшӧммесланьӧ, кытшӧммезысланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьсянь, кытшӧммезысланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьӧт, кытшӧммезысланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяс, кытшӧммезланьӧттис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьӧдз, кытшӧммезысланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззас, кытшӧммезланьӧдззис]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [кытшӧммесланьви, кытшӧммезысланьви]

 
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: кытшӧммезным
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымӧс
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнаным 
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Com+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымкӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымтӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымла
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымся
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: кытшӧммезаным
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [кытшӧммесиным, кытшӧммезсиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: кытшӧммезаным
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымлань, кытшӧммезланяным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымсянь, кытшӧммезсяняным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезӧттяным, кытшӧммезӧттиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезӧдззаным, кытшӧммезӧдззиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымви
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезланяным, кытшӧммезнымланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезланьсиным, кытшӧммезнымланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезланяным, кытшӧммезнымланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяным, кытшӧммезланьӧттиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кытшӧммезнымланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаным, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиным]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: кытшӧммезнымланьви 


    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: кытшӧммезныт
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытлӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытлісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытлӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнаныт 
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Com+PxPl2: кытшӧммезныткӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезныттӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытла
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытся
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: кытшӧммезаныт
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [кытшӧммесиныт, кытшӧммезсиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: кытшӧммезаныт
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытлань, кытшӧммезланяныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытсянь, кытшӧммезсяняныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезӧттяныт, кытшӧммезӧттиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезӧдззаныт, кытшӧммезӧдззиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытви
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезланяныт, кытшӧммезнытланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезланьсиныт, кытшӧммезнытланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезланяныт, кытшӧммезнытланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяныт, кытшӧммезланьӧттиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кытшӧммезнытланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаныт, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиныт]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: кытшӧммезнытланьви 


    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныс
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныслӧн
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныслісь
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныслӧ
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнаныс 
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Com+PxPl3: кытшӧммезныскӧт
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезныстӧг, кытшӧммезтӧгьяныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысла
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысся
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: кытшӧммезаныс
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [кытшӧммесиныс, кытшӧммезсиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: кытшӧммезаныс
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезныслань, кытшӧммезланяныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезныссянь, кытшӧммезсяняныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезӧттяныс, кытшӧммезӧттиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезӧдззаныс, кытшӧммезӧдззиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысви
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезланяныс, кытшӧммезнысланьын]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезланьсиныс, кытшӧммезнысланись]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезланяныс, кытшӧммезнысланьӧ]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезнысланьсянь, кытшӧммезланьсяняныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезнысланьӧт, кытшӧммезланьӧттяныс, кытшӧммезланьӧттиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кытшӧммезнысланьӧдз, кытшӧммезланьӧдззаныс, кытшӧммезланьӧдззиныс]
    кытшӧм+Det+Rel+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: кытшӧммезнысланьви 
